Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.550

Orders under this and other chapters—Enforcement and consolidation—Validity and enforcement of orders under prior chapters.

(1)(a) Any order available under this chapter, other than an extreme risk protection order, may be issued in actions under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW. If a protection order is issued in an action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW, the order must be issued on the forms mandated by RCW 7.105.115. An order issued in accordance with this subsection (1)(a) is fully enforceable and must be enforced under the provisions of this chapter.

(b) If a party files an action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW, an order issued previously under this chapter between the same parties may be consolidated by the court under that action and cause number. Any order issued under this chapter after consolidation must contain the original cause number and the cause number of the action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.

(2) Nothing in chapter 215, Laws of 2021 affects the validity of protection orders issued prior to July 1, 2022, under chapter 74.34 RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 7.94, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW. Protection orders entered prior to July 1, 2022, under chapter 74.34 RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 7.94, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW are subject to the provisions of chapter 215, Laws of 2021 and are fully enforceable under the applicable provisions of RCW 7.105.450 through 7.105.470 and may be modified or terminated in accordance with the applicable provisions of RCW 7.105.500 through 7.105.550.

[ 2021 c 215 s 65.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.